Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.710

Annual review of medication practices of five jails that use nonpractitioner jail personnel—Noncompliance.

The department of health shall annually review the medication practices of five jails that provide for the delivery and administration of medications to inmates in their custody by nonpractitioner jail personnel. The review shall assess whether the jails are in compliance with sections 3 and 4, chapter 411, Laws of 2009. To the extent that a jail is found not in compliance, the department shall provide technical assistance to assist the jail in resolving any areas of noncompliance.

[ 2009 c 411 s 5.]